Washington statutes.
RCW 36.94.360

Transfer of system from municipal corporation to county—RCW 36.94.310 through 36.94.350 deemed alternative method.

The provisions of RCW 36.94.310 through 36.94.350 shall be deemed to provide an alternative method for the doing of the things therein authorized and shall not be construed as imposing any additional conditions upon the exercise of any other powers vested in municipal corporations or counties.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 188 s 12.]